Alaska statutes. Title 34. Property.
Article 8. Fishermen’s Lien.

Sec. 34.35.391.
Fishermen’s lien.

A person who sells fish to a fish processor as defined in AS

16.10.296

, or to a primary fish buyer as defined in AS

16.10.296

, or to a cooperative corporation organized under AS 10.15, and receives a fish ticket or a record of purchase as described in AS

16.05.690

has a lien upon the property of the fish processor, primary fish buyer, or cooperative corporation for the value of the fish.

A person who claims the benefit of this section shall, within 90 days of the date the fish are sold, record a claim of lien in the recorder’s office of the recording district where the fish were sold.

The lien provided in this section is preferred, prior, and superior to a mortgage, attachment, claim, or demand made or recorded in the recording district in which the property is located after the date on which the fish are delivered to the buyer of the fish.

History.

(§ 6 ch 94 SLA 1982)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes related to the recording of documents were made in subsections (b) and (c) of this section in 1988 because of the enactment of ch. 161, SLA 1988.